Massachusetts, session 194th, S306.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Commonwealth, through the Executive Office of Housing and Economic
Development, shall institute a pilot program to offer a competitive grant program for startup
companies owned by Massachusetts residents and business owners. For the purposes of this
section, “startup company” shall be defined as a newly emerged business venture that aims to
develop a viable business model to meet a marketplace need. The pilot program shall aim to
provide ten grants totaling $500,000 to eligible startup companies who apply for the grant. The
Executive Office of Housing Economic Development shall promulgate parameters of eligibility
and guidelines for application to the grant program, provided that the program be open for
application no later than December 1, 2025, and the funding be awarded to selected winners no
later than July 1, 2026. The Executive Office of Housing and Economic Development shall
of 2

submit a report to the Clerks of the House and Senate detailing the progress of the pilot program
as well as the economic consequences of the grants on the recipient startup companies no later
than July 1, 2027.
of 2